dictionaries/gl_ES/src/gl_ES.dic
aborrécer/666,315,415,515
abstráer/666,315,415,515
acáer/666,415
accéder/666,415
acénder/666,315,415,515
adoécer/666,415
adormécer/666,415
alborécer/666,415
amarelécer/666,415
améter/666,415
amolécer/666,315,415
amortécer/666,315,415
antecéder/666,315,415
aparécer/666,415
aparécer/666,415,515
apetécer/666,315,415
apoñer/320,321,326,327,328,329,332,420,421,426,427,428,429,432
aprácer/666,415
aprénder/666,315,415
aquécer/666,415
arborécer/666,415
árder/666,415
arrecénder/666,415
arrécer/666,315,415
arrécer/666,415
arrefécer/666,315,415
arreméter/666,315,415
arrequécer/666,315,415
arrequécer/666,415
ascénder/666,315,415
atánguer/666,315,415
aténder/666,315,415
aterécer/666,415
atráer/666,315,415
atráer/666,315,415,515
avécer/666,415
avivécer/666,315,415,515
balorécer/666,415
báter/666,315,415,515
béber/666,315,415
caber/420,421,422,427,428,429
cáer/666,415
carécer/666,415
céder/666,315,415
cócer/666,315,415
cócer/666,315,415,515
cóller/666,315,415
cóller/666,315,415,515
combáter/666,315,415
cómer/666,315,415
comparécer/666,415
comprácer/666,315,415,515
concórrer/666,415
condescénder/666,415
coñécer/666,315,415,515
conténder/666,415
contráer/666,315,415,515
controvérter/666,315,415
convalécer/666,415
convérxer/666,415
córrer/666,315,415
correspónder/666,315,415
correspónder/666,415,515
cóser/666,315,415
couber/666,423,424,425
crécer/666,415
déber/666,315,415,515
decáer/666,415
decórrer/666,415
decrécer/666,415
defénder/666,315,415,515
degráer/666,315,415
depénder/666,415
deprénder/666,315,415
desadormécer/666,415
desaparécer/666,415
desarrefécer/666,415
descénder/666,315,415
desencóller/666,415
desenmudécer/666,415
desenrouquécer/666,315,415
desensandécer/666,415
desensoberbécer/666,415
desentebrécer/666,315,415,515
desentumécer/666,315,415,515
desescurécer/666,415
desesmorécer/666,415
desfalécer/666,415
desmerécer/666,415
desobedécer/666,315,415
desprácer/666,415
devécer/666,415
devólver/666,315,415
discórrer/666,315,415
dispoñer/320,321,332,326,327,328,329,420,421,432,426,427,428,429,520,521,532,526,527,528,529
dispuxer/666,323,324,325,423,424,425,523,524,525
divérxer/666,415
dóer/666,415,515
embastécer/666,415
embéber/666,315,415,515
embranquécer/666,415
emérxer/666,415
empardécer/666,415
emparvécer/666,415
empequenécer/666,315,415
empobrécer/666,315,415,515
encalécer/666,315,415
encalvécer/666,415
encampécer/666,415
encanécer/666,315,415
encarécer/666,315,415
éncher/666,315,415,515
encóller/666,315,415,515
endentécer/666,415
endurécer/666,315,415
enfraquécer/666,415
engafécer/666,415
engraécer/666,415
engrandécer/666,315,415,515
engravécer/666,415
enlouquécer/666,315,415
enlourécer/666,415
enmagrécer/666,315,415
enmestécer/666,315,415
enmocécer/666,315,415
enmudécer/666,315,415
ennegrécer/666,415
enrarécer/666,415
enriquécer/666,315,415,515
enrouquécer/666,315,415
enrudécer/666,315,415
ensandécer/666,315,415
entalécer/666,415
entanguécer/666,415
entebrécer/666,315,415,515
enténder/666,315,415,515
entolécer/666,315,415
entolécer/666,415
entumécer/666,315,415,515
envellécer/666,315,415
envellécer/666,415
enverdécer/666,415
envilécer/666,315,415,515
enxordécer/666,315,415
equivaler/420,421,422,424,425,427,428,429
esborréxer/666,415
escórrer/666,315,415
escurécer/666,315,415
eser/666,322,422,522
esgarécer/666,415
eslumécer/666,415
esmorécer/666,415
esquécer/666,315,415,515
estarrécer/666,315,415
estreitécer/666,315,415
estremécer/666,315,415
estremécer/666,315,415,515
exércer/666,315,415
facer/320,321,322,328,329,420,421,422,428,429,520,521,522,528,529
falécer/666,415
féder/666,415
fénder/666,315,415
fenécer/666,415
férver/666,315,415
fixer/666,323,324,325,423,424,425,523,524,525
florécer/666,415
fóder/666,315,415,515
for/666,323,324,325,423,424,425,523,524,525
haber/320,321,322,327,328,329,420,421,422,427,428,429,520,521,522,527,528,529
incomparécer/666,415
incórrer/666,415
intercéder/666,415
irrómper/666,415
languidécer/666,415
levedécer/666,415
madurécer/666,415
malcómer/666,315,415
manter/320,321,327,329,332,420,421,427,429,432,520,521,527,529,532
manter/320,321,332,327,329,420,421,432,427,429,520,521,532,527,529
marelécer/666,415
méter/666,315,415,515
méxer/666,315,415,515
mórder/666,315,415
mórrer/666,415
móver/666,315,415,515
nácer/666,415
obedécer/666,315,415
ocórrer/666,415,515
pácer/666,315,415
padécer/666,315,415
palidécer/666,415
parécer/666,415,515
pénder/666,415
pérder/666,315,415,515
perécer/666,415
permanécer/666,415
perténcer/666,415
podrécer/666,415
prémer/666,315,415
premórrer/666,415
prénder/666,315,415
prevalécer/666,415
prevalécer/666,415,515
procéder/666,415
próer/666,415
prométer/666,315,415,515
propénder/666,415
prorrómper/666,415
puider/666,323,324,325,423,424,425,523,524,525
quécer/666,415
quéncer/666,415
querer/10,320,321,322,327,328,329,420,421,422,427,428,429
quixer/666,323,324,325,423,424,425
reaparécer/666,415
recáer/666,415
recénder/666,415
recócer/666,315,415
recóller/666,315,415,515
recórrer/666,315,415
recórrer/666,415
reférver/666,315,415
reflorécer/666,415
remanécer/666,415
reméxer/666,315,415,515
remóer/666,315,415
remórder/666,415
remóver/666,315,415,515
renácer/666,415
rénder/666,315,415,515
rénxer/666,415
requécer/666,415
resplandécer/666,415
respónder/666,315,415
retrémer/666,415
retrocéder/666,415
revellécer/666,415
rever/320,321,327,328,329,332,420,421,427,429,432,438
rever/420,421,432,427,438,429
reverdécer/666,315,415
revérter/666,415
revir/666,323,324,335,423,424,435
revólver/666,315,415,515
réxer/666,315,415,515
rexuvenécer/666,315,415
rexuvenécer/666,415
róer/666,315,415
rómper/666,315,415
rómper/666,315,415,515
sófrer/666,315,415
subxácer/666,415
sucéder/666,315,415,515
suspénder/666,315,415,515
técer/666,315,415
témer/666,315,415
ténder/666,315,415,515
ter/320,321,322,327,329,420,421,422,427,429,520,521,522,527,529
tórcer/666,315,415,515
transcénder/666,315,415
transcórrer/666,415
trémer/666,415
várrer/666,315,415
véncer/666,315,415
vénder/666,315,415,515
ver/320,321,322,327,328,329,420,421,422,427,428,429,520,521,522,527,528,529
vérter/666,315,415,515
vir/666,323,324,325,423,424,425,523,524,525
vólver/666,315,415,515
xácer/666,415
xémer/666,415
xoécer/666,415
